Missouri, session 2026, HB2007.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period
beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Section 7.000. An appropriation may be comprised in whole or in part of
a one-time amount, and such one-time amount shall be construed
to be a component part of, and not in addition to, the stated
appropriation amount. Any amount of an appropriation identified
as “one-time” in this act shall not be considered an addition to
any ongoing core appropriation(s) in future fiscal periods beyond
June 30, 2027. Any amount identified as one-time may, however,
be requested in any future fiscal period as a new decision item.

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 2
Section 7.005. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Regional Engagement Division, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.175
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,710,496
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 755,488
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,465,984
Personal Service ..................................................................................................355,018
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 60,136
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155) ........................................................415,154
Personal Service
From Department of Economic Development Community Development
Block Grant (Administration) Fund (1123) ..........................................................63,521
Personal Service
From Department of Economic Development Administrative Fund
(1547) ....................................................................................................................22,170
Expense and Equipment
From International Promotions Revolving Fund (1567) ................................................600,001
Expense and Equipment
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783) ............................................355,000
For regional engagement and minority participation and inclusion efforts
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................91,666
For International Trade and Investment Offices
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783) .........................................1,500,000
For business recruitment and marketing
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783) ................................. 3,500,000
Total (Not to exceed 33.88 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$9,013,496
Section 7.010. To the Department of Economic Development
For Delta Regional Authority Organizational Dues
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783) ..........................................$168,945

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 3
Section 7.015. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Business and Community Solutions Division provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.175
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,356,175
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 166,264
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,522,439
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,473,705
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 253,377
From Department of Economic Development Community Development
Block Grant (Administration) Fund (1123) .....................................................1,727,082
Personal Service ..................................................................................................112,708
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 20,000
From Department of Economic Development Administrative Fund
(1547) ..................................................................................................................132,708
Personal Service ....................................................................................................56,576
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,890
From State Supplemental Downtown Development Fund (1766) ....................................60,466
Personal Service
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783) ............................................214,642
For an organization of sworn law enforcement officers for improving the
working conditions of law enforcement officers and the safety of
those they serve through education, legislation, information,
community involvement and employee representation
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................500,000
For refunding any overpayment or erroneous payment of any amount that
is credited to the Economic Development Advancement Fund
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783) ................................. 10,000
Total (Not to exceed 60.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$5,167,337
Section 7.020. To the Department of Economic Development
For tourism infrastructure pursuant to Section 99.585, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,500,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 4
For a 501(c)3 nonprofit organization in any city not within a county that
ensures grounds of the area, neighboring public spaces and
attractions will be a vital, welcoming, and well-supported
resource for the community and nation for generations to come
From General Revenue (1101) (one-time) ........................................................... 200,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$2,700,000
Section 7.025. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Missouri Supplemental Tax Increment Financing Fund, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 7.175
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$36,856,615
Section 7.030. To the Department of Economic Development
For Missouri supplemental tax increment financing as provided in
Section 99.845, RSMo. This appropriation may be used for the
following projects: Springfield Jordan Valley Park, Kansas City
Bannister Mall/Three Trails Office, Old Post Office in Kansas
City (Pershing Road), 1200 Main Garage Project in Kansas City,
Riverside Levee, Branson Landing, Eastern Jackson County Bass
Pro, Kansas City East Village Project, St. Louis Innovation
District, National Geospatial Agency West, Fenton Logistics
Park, IDEA Commons, and Lakeport Village. The presence of a
project in this list is not an indication said project is nor shall be
approved for tax increment financing. A listed project must have
completed the application process and a certificate of approval
must have been issued pursuant to Section 99.845 (10), RSMo,
before a project may be disbursed funds subject to the
appropriation.
From Missouri Supplemental Tax Increment Financing Fund (1848) ....................$36,856,615
Section 7.031. To the Department of Economic Development
For the promotion, development, and support of a sports and
entertainment community improvement district located in any
city not within a county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Section 7.035. To the Department of Economic Development

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 5
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, such
amounts generated by development projects, as required by
Section 99.963, RSMo, to the State Supplemental Downtown
Development Fund, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.175
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,902,617
Section 7.040. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Missouri Downtown Economic Stimulus Act as provided in
Sections 99.915 to 99.980, RSMo
From State Supplemental Downtown Development Fund (1766) .............................$3,848,056
Section 7.045. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, such
amounts generated by redevelopment projects, as required by
Section 99.1092, RSMo, to the Downtown Revitalization
Preservation Fund, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.175
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$360,500
Section 7.050. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Downtown Revitalization Preservation Program as provided in
Sections 99.1080 to 99.1092, RSMo
From Downtown Revitalization Preservation Fund (1907) ..........................................$360,500
Section 7.055. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Business and Community Solutions Division
For the Community Development Block Grant Program
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Economic Development Community Development
Block Grant (Pass-Through) Fund (1118) ...................................................$47,318,920
For the Community Development Block Grant - Disaster Recovery
Program
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Economic Development Community Development
Block Grant (Pass-Through) Fund (1118) .....................................................47,681,080
For the Community Development Block Grant - Federal Stimulus
Program

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 6
For projects to support local community development activities
From Department of Economic Development Federal Stimulus Fund
(2360) ....................................................................................................... 18,399,870
Total .......................................................................................................................$113,399,870
Section 7.065. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Business and Community Solutions Division
For the Missouri Main Street Program
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783) ..........................................$950,000
Section 7.070. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Business and Community Solutions Division
For the Missouri Community Service Commission
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$14,407
Personal Service ..................................................................................................383,825
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 16,590,451
From Community Service Commission Fund (1197) .......................................... 16,974,276
Total (Not to exceed 7.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$16,988,683
Section 7.075. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Missouri Technology Investment Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,500,000
Section 7.080. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Missouri Technology Corporation, provided that all funds
appropriated to the Missouri Technology Corporation by the
General Assembly shall be subject to the provisions of Section
196.1127, RSMo
For administration and for science and technology development,
including but not limited to, innovation centers and the Missouri
Manufacturing Extension Partnership
From Missouri Technology Investment Fund (1172) ................................................$2,500,000
For an organization that supports workforce integration and
programming activities located in any city not within a county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................750,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 7
For an organization located in any city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county, that
stimulates collaboration, accelerates emerging technology and
creates opportunities in healthcare innovation
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................1,000,000
For an organization located in any city with more than one hundred
twenty-five thousand but fewer than one hundred sixty thousand
inhabitants for the creation and scaling of science-based startup
companies in Mid-Missouri leveraging University of Missouri
research assets to drive job creation, retain intellectual talent, and
advance innovation in agriculture and healthcare, including
activities related to startup formation, capital attraction, and
commercialization efforts
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 150,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,400,000
Section 7.085. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Business and Community Solution Division
For a grant to a public university with an established partnership with a
not-for-profit organization that has received a similar state-
funded grant for establishing Missouri in re-shoring active
pharmaceutical ingredient (API) manufacturing
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,415,855
Section 7.090. To the Department of Economic Development
For the State Small Business Credit Initiative
From Department of Economic Development Federal Stimulus – 2021
Fund (2451) ..................................................................................................$57,986,480
Section 7.095. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Missouri One Start Division, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.175
Personal Service ................................................................................................$841,499
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 106,414
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 12.00 F.T.E.) .............................$947,913

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 8
Section 7.100. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Community College Training Program
For training of workers by community college districts
From Missouri One Start Community College Training Fund (1538) ....................$20,000,000
Section 7.110. To the Department of Economic Development
For new and expanding industry training programs and basic industry
retraining programs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$15,116,835
From Missouri One Start Job Development Fund (1600) ................................... 126,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$15,242,835
Section 7.115. To the Department of Economic Development
For job training programs that provide upskill credentials
From Upskill Credential Training Fund (1849) .........................................................$6,000,000
Section 7.120. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Strategy and Performance Division, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.175
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,040,625
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 187,955
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,228,580
Personal Service ....................................................................................................81,337
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 12,832
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155) ..........................................................94,169
Personal Service
From Department of Economic Development Administrative Fund
(1547) ..................................................................................................................124,710
For the purpose of promoting Missouri hardwood forest products and to
educate the public on the value and benefit of such products. The
Department may contract with any statewide association
dedicated to the promotion of Missouri hardwood forest products
From General Revenue (1101) (one-time) ........................................................... 500,000
Total (Not to exceed 14.74 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,947,459

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 9
Section 7.125. To the Department of Economic Development
For Broadband Grants
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,167,302
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 7,285,254
From Department of Economic Development Federal Fund (1129)
(Not to exceed 23.00 F.T.E)...........................................................................$9,452,556
Section 7.130. To the Department of Economic Development
For the response to, and analysis of, the impact of Missouri’s military
bases on the nation’s military readiness and the state’s economy
and advocacy of the continued presence and expansion of
military installations in the state, provided five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.175
Personal Service ................................................................................................$208,564
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 434,651
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 1.50 F.T.E.) ...............................$643,215
Section 7.135. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Missouri Military Community Reinvestment Program, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 7.175
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$300,000
Section 7.140. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
7.175
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$26,237,355
Section 7.145. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Division of Tourism to include coordination of advertising of at
least $70,000 for the Missouri State Fair, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,140,035
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 16,542,623
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274) ..............................18,682,658

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 10
For the Cooperative Marketing Program
Expense and Equipment
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274) ................................5,000,000
For the Missouri Film Office
Expense and Equipment
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274) ...................................200,246
For a redevelopment authority to support the history and art form of
American Jazz located within a home rule city with more than
four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274) ...................................100,000
For a museum, located within a home rule city with more than 400,000
inhabitants and located in more than one county, with archives
which highlight African-American cultural contributions and
history in Missouri
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274) ...................................300,000
For sponsorship of events that promote Missouri tourism
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274) ................................2,000,000
For expenses related to the Great American State Fair in Washington
D.C.
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274)
(one-time) ............................................................................................................150,000
For celebrations during the month of June commemorating the
emancipation of black slaves in the United States located in any
city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274)
(one-time) ............................................................................................................100,000
Expense and Equipment
From Tourism Marketing Fund (1650) ................................................................ 24,500
Total (Not to exceed 31.50 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$26,557,404
Section 7.150. To the Department of Economic Development

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 11
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Major
Economic Convention Event in Missouri Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 7.151. To the Department of Economic Development
For a museum, located in a city with more than three thousand four
hundred but fewer than three thousand eight hundred inhabitants
and located in a county with more than twenty-five thousand but
fewer than thirty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than eight thousand but fewer than twelve thousand
inhabitants, who provides programs and exhibits, in collaboration
with schools, colleges, and community organizations, in the
fields of math, science, natural resources, human relations, and
the arts
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................$50,000
Section 7.155. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Meet in Missouri Act as provided in Section 620.1620, RSMo
From Major Economic Convention Event in Missouri Fund (1593) .........................$2,000,000
Section 7.160. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Missouri Housing Development Commission
For general administration of affordable housing activities
For funding housing subsidy grants or loans
From Missouri Housing Trust Fund (1254) ...............................................................$6,500,000
Section 7.165. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Administrative Services Division, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.175
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,124,319
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 103,957
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,228,276
Personal Service ....................................................................................................63,161
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,777
From Department of Economic Development Community Development
Block Grant (Administration) Fund (1123) ..........................................................64,938

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 12
Personal Service ..................................................................................................361,209
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 194,585
From Department of Economic Development Administrative Fund
(1547) ..................................................................................................................555,794
For refunds
From Department of Economic Development Administrative Fund
(1547) ....................................................................................................... 12,000
Total (Not to exceed 16.54 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,861,008
Section 7.170. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for payment
of administrative costs, to the Department of Economic
Development Administrative Fund
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274) .................................$162,974
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783) ................................. 117,695
Total ..............................................................................................................................$280,669
Section 7.175. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Section 7.400. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For Administrative Services
Personal Service ................................................................................................$353,254
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 47,404
From DCI Administrative Fund (1503) (Not to exceed 3.07 F.T.E.) ...........................$400,658
Section 7.405. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for
administrative services, to the DCI Administrative Fund,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 7.560
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................$10,000
From Division of Credit Unions Fund (1548) ..................................................................30,767
From Division of Finance Fund (1550) ..........................................................................111,179
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566) ...........................................................................37,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 13
From Manufactured Housing Fund (1582) .........................................................................8,403
From Public Service Commission Fund (1607) ..............................................................180,281
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689) .........................................................208,144
From Office of Public Counsel Fund (1508) ....................................................... 26,036
Total ..............................................................................................................................$611,810
Section 7.410. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For Insurance Operations, including market conduct and financial
examinations of insurance companies, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment and further provided twenty percent
(20%) flexibility is allowed between funds within this section
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$13,732,871
Expense and Equipment (including $105,525 one-time) .................................1,665,435
For refunds .......................................................................................................... 75,000
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566) ....................................................................15,473,306
Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,069,244
Expense and Equipment ......................................................................................401,033
For refunds ........................................................................................................... 60,000
From Insurance Examiners Fund (1552) .....................................................................4,530,277
For consumer restitution payments
From Consumer Restitution Fund (1792) ............................................................ 5,000
Total (Not to exceed 201.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$20,008,583
Section 7.415. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For programs providing counseling on health insurance coverage and
benefits to Medicare beneficiaries
From Missouri Department of Insurance Federal Fund (1192) .................................$1,650,000
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566) .............................................................. 200,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,850,000
Section 7.420. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Division of Credit Unions
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,576,381
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 164,605
From Division of Credit Unions Fund (1548) (Not to exceed 15.50
F.T.E.) ............................................................................................................$1,740,986

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 14
Section 7.425. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Division of Finance, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$11,640,071
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 878,769
From Division of Finance Fund (1550) .....................................................................12,518,840
For Conference of State Bank Supervisors dues
From Division of Finance Fund (1550) ............................................................... 175,000
Total (Not to exceed 105.15 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$12,693,840
Section 7.430. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
purpose of supervising state chartered savings and loan
associations, to the Division of Finance Fund
From Division of Savings and Loan Supervision Fund (1549) ....................................$125,000
Section 7.435. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
purpose of administering the Residential Mortgage Licensing
Law, to the Division of Finance Fund
From Residential Mortgage Licensing Fund (1261) ..................................................$2,000,000
Section 7.436. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
purpose of administering various consumer licensing laws, to the
Division of Finance Fund
From Consumer Licensing Fund (1204) ....................................................................$2,000,000
Section 7.440. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, in
accordance with Section 369.324, RSMo, to the General Revenue
Fund
From Division of Savings and Loan Supervision Fund (1549) ......................................$50,000
Section 7.445. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for
implementation of the Missouri Family Trust Company Act
From Family Trust Company Fund (1810) .....................................................................$20,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 15
Section 7.450. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For general administration of the Division of Professional Registration,
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................$5,100,038
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,086,395
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689) ......................................................6,186,433
For examination and other fees
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689) .........................................................102,000
For Real Estate Appraiser Committee Fees
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689) .........................................................500,000
For refunds
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689) .............................................. 125,000
Total (Not to exceed 90.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,913,433
Section 7.455. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Accountancy
Personal Service ................................................................................................$410,551
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 250,671
From State Board of Accountancy Fund (1627) (Not to exceed 7.00
F.T.E.) ...............................................................................................................$661,222
Section 7.460. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board for Architects, Professional Engineers, Professional
Land Surveyors and Professional Landscape Architects
Personal Service ................................................................................................$512,739
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 306,502
From State Board for Architects, Professional Engineers, Professional
Land Surveyors and Professional Landscape Architects Fund
(1678) (Not to exceed 9.00 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$819,241
Section 7.465. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners
Expense and Equipment
From State Board of Chiropractic Examiners Fund (1630) ..........................................$132,503
Section 7.470. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Cosmetology and Barber Examiners

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 16
Expense and Equipment
From Board of Cosmetology and Barber Examiners Fund (1785) ...............................$317,062
Section 7.475. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Missouri Dental Board
Personal Service ................................................................................................$487,975
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 239,687
From Dental Board Fund (1677) (Not to exceed 7.50 F.T.E.) ......................................$727,662
Section 7.480. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Embalmers and Funeral Directors
Expense and Equipment
From Board of Embalmers and Funeral Directors Fund (1633) ...................................$165,501
Section 7.485. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Registration for the Healing Arts
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,601,938
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 755,102
From Board of Registration for the Healing Arts Fund (1634) (Not to
exceed 44.00 F.T.E.) ......................................................................................$3,357,040
Section 7.490. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Nursing
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,748,109
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 580,063
From State Board of Nursing Fund (1635) ..................................................................2,328,172
For competitive grants to eligible institutions of higher education based
on a process and criteria jointly determined by the State Board of
Nursing and the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
From State Board of Nursing Fund (1635) .......................................................... 3,000,000
Total (Not to exceed 28.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$5,328,172
Section 7.495. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Optometry
Expense and Equipment
From Optometry Fund (1636) .........................................................................................$35,419
Section 7.500. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 17
For the State Board of Pharmacy
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,607,381
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,170,977
From Board of Pharmacy Fund (1637) ........................................................................2,778,358
For a non-profit association located in any city with more than forty
thousand but fewer than fifty-one thousand inhabitants and
partially located in a county with more than seventy thousand but
fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants that was established in
1879 and focused on pharmacy to develop a software system to
evaluate gaps in access to medications or other interventions
among patients with chronic diseases or high-risk factors
From Board of Pharmacy Fund (1637) ................................................................ 250,000
Total (Not to exceed 16.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,028,358
Section 7.505. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Podiatric Medicine
Expense and Equipment
From State Board of Podiatric Medicine Fund (1629) ...................................................$13,773
Section 7.510. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Missouri Real Estate Commission
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,298,700
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 278,860
From Real Estate Commission Fund (1638) (Not to exceed 25.00
F.T.E.) ............................................................................................................$1,577,560
Section 7.515. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Missouri Veterinary Medical Board
Expense and Equipment
From Veterinary Medical Board Fund (1639) ................................................................$59,769
Section 7.520. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for
administrative costs, to the General Revenue Fund
From Professional Registration Board Funds (Various) ............................................$1,461,218
Section 7.525. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for payment
of operating expenses, to the Professional Registration Fees Fund

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 18
From Professional Registration Board Funds (Various) ..........................................$10,828,052
Section 7.530. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for funding
new licensing activity pursuant to Section 324.016, RSMo, to the
Professional Registration Fees Fund
From Board of Registration for the Healing Arts Fund (1634) ....................................$200,000
Section 7.535. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
reimbursement of funds loaned for new licensing activity
pursuant to Section 324.016, RSMo, to the appropriate board
fund
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689) .......................................................$320,000
Section 7.540. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For Manufactured Housing
Personal Service ................................................................................................$516,757
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 354,484
From Manufactured Housing Fund (1582) .....................................................................871,241
For Manufactured Housing programs
From Manufactured Housing Fund (1582) .......................................................................50,000
For refunds
From Manufactured Housing Fund (1582) .......................................................................10,000
For Manufactured Housing to pay consumer claims
From Manufactured Housing Consumer Recovery Fund (1909) ........................ 192,000
Total (Not to exceed 8.00 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$1,123,241
Section 7.545. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Manufactured Housing Consumer Recovery Fund
From Manufactured Housing Fund (1582) ...................................................................$192,000
Section 7.550. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Office of the Public Counsel provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.560

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 19
Personal Service (one-time) ..............................................................................$175,887
Expense and Equipment (one-time) ......................................................... 74,113
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................250,000
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,947,729
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 829,686
From Office of Public Counsel Fund (1508) ....................................................... 2,777,415
Total (Not to exceed 23.00 F.T.E.) (including 2.00 F.T.E. one-time) .......................$3,027,415
Section 7.555. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Public Service Commission
For general administration of utility regulation activities, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$21,799,851
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,393,197
From Public Service Commission Fund (1607) .........................................................24,193,048
For refunds
From Public Service Commission Fund (1607) ................................................................10,000
For the Deaf Relay Service and Equipment Distribution Program
From Deaf Relay Service and Equipment Distribution Fund
(1559) ....................................................................................................... 495,886
Total (Not to exceed 209.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$24,698,934
Section 7.560. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Section 7.800. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Director and Staff
Personal Service .............................................................................................$3,853,361
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,397,513
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Administrative
Fund (1122) ......................................................................................................5,250,874
Expense and Equipment

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 20
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948) ..................... 1,010,000
Total (Not to exceed 51.65 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,260,874
Section 7.805. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for payment
of administrative costs, to the Department of Labor and Industrial
Relations Administrative Fund, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$647,262
From Division of Labor Standards Federal Fund (1186) ..................................................58,784
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948) .............................3,586,698
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Federal Stimulus
Fund (2375) .........................................................................................................572,410
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Federal Stimulus
– 2021 Fund (2452) .............................................................................................250,388
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ................................................................1,724,622
From Special Employment Security Fund (1949) ............................................... 174,067
Total ...........................................................................................................................$7,014,231
Section 7.810. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for payment
of administrative costs charged by the Office of Administration,
to the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Administrative Fund, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$609,028
From Division of Labor Standards Federal Fund (1186) ..................................................63,954
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948) .............................4,942,583
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Federal Stimulus
Fund (2375) ......................................................................................................1,386,822
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Federal Stimulus –
2021 Fund (2452) ................................................................................................397,842
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ................................................................1,048,277
From Special Employment Security Fund (1949) ............................................... 128,804
Total ...........................................................................................................................$8,577,310
Section 7.815. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Labor and Industrial Relations Commission, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 21
expense and equipment, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.905
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$18,320
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 868
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................19,188
Personal Service ..................................................................................................680,373
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 28,140
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948) ................................708,513
Personal Service ..................................................................................................624,807
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 30,440
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ........................................................ 655,247
Total (Not to exceed 13.59 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,382,948
Section 7.820. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Labor Standards
For Administration, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 7.905
Personal Service ................................................................................................$171,740
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 17,086
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................188,826
Personal Service ..................................................................................................113,255
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 48,000
From Division of Labor Standards - Federal Fund (1186) .............................................161,255
Personal Service ..................................................................................................135,229
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,330
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ...................................................................145,559
For the Child Labor Program, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between the
Child Labor Program, Prevailing Wage Program, and Minimum
Wage Program, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.905
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................72,735

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 22
Expense and Equipment
From Child Labor Enforcement Fund (1826) ...................................................................79,903
For the Prevailing Wage Program, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between the
Child Labor Program, Prevailing Wage Program, and Minimum
Wage Program, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.905
Personal Service ..................................................................................................135,274
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 500
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................135,774
For the Minimum Wage Program, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between the
Child Labor Program, Prevailing Wage Program, and Minimum
Wage Program, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.905
Personal Service ..................................................................................................144,369
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,448
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 149,817
Total (Not to exceed 12.99 F.T.E.) ...............................................................................$933,869
Section 7.825. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Labor Standards provided five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment
For safety and health programs
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$72,972
Personal Service ..................................................................................................875,803
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 261,055
From Division of Labor Standards Federal Fund (1186) .............................................1,136,858
Personal Service ..................................................................................................153,320
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 39,542
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ........................................................ 192,862

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 23
Total (Not to exceed 17.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,402,692
Section 7.830. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Labor Standards
For mine safety and health training programs
Personal Service ................................................................................................$242,021
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 137,429
From Division of Labor Standards Federal Fund (1186) ................................................379,450
Personal Service ..................................................................................................104,501
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 12,164
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ...................................................................116,665
For the Mine and Cave Inspection Program provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.905
Personal Service ..................................................................................................140,322
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 15,083
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................155,405
Personal Service ....................................................................................................80,407
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 63,027
From State Mine Inspection Fund (1973) ............................................................ 143,434
Total (Not to exceed 7.23 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$794,954
Section 7.835. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the State Board of Mediation provided ten percent (10%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 7.905
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$72,516
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,288
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 1.50 F.T.E.) .................................$78,804
Section 7.840. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Workers’ Compensation
For Administration provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$10,079,168

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 24
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,382,595
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) ..............................................................11,461,763
Personal Service ....................................................................................................65,511
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 29,836
From Tort Victims’ Compensation Fund (1622) ................................................. 95,347
Total (Not to exceed 139.25 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$11,557,110
Section 7.845. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Workers’ Compensation
For payment of special claims
From Workers’ Compensation Second Injury Fund (1653) ....................................$70,060,833
Section 7.850. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Workers’ Compensation
For refunds for overpayment of any tax or any payment credited to the
Workers’ Compensation Second Injury Fund
From Workers’ Compensation Second Injury Fund (1653) .........................................$250,000
Section 7.855. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Line
of Duty Compensation Fund, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,200,000
Section 7.860. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Line of Duty Compensation Program as provided in Section
287.243, RSMo
From Line of Duty Compensation Fund (1939) ........................................................$1,200,000
Section 7.865. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Workers’ Compensation
For payments of claims to tort victims
From Tort Victims’ Compensation Fund (1622) ...................................................$150,000,000
Section 7.870. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, pursuant to
Section 537.675, RSMo, to the Basic Civil Legal Services Fund
From Tort Victims’ Compensation Fund (1622) .......................................................$1,300,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 25
Section 7.875. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Employment Security, provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$819,142
Personal Service .............................................................................................25,328,476
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 7,809,646
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948) ...........................33,138,122
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,292,274
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,600,846
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Federal Stimulus
Fund (2375) ......................................................................................................4,893,120
Personal Service ..................................................................................................400,314
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,449,216
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Federal Stimulus –
2021 Fund (2452) .............................................................................................1,849,530
Personal Service ...............................................................................................6,679,992
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,320,008
From Unemployment Administration Adjustment Fund (1387) ...............................10,000,000
Personal Service ..................................................................................................532,558
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 16,143
From Unemployment Automation Fund (1953) .............................................................548,701
For information technology hardware, software, and/or system
enhancements and improvements
Personal Service ..................................................................................................893,657
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,000,000
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948) ..................... 4,893,657
Total (Not to exceed 497.72 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$56,142,272
Section 7.880. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Employment Security
For administration of programs authorized and funded by the United
States Department of Labor, such as Disaster Unemployment
Assistance (DUA), and provided that all funds shall be expended

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 26
from discrete accounts and that no monies shall be expended for
funding administration of these programs by the Division of
Employment Security
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948) ...........................$2,000,000
Section 7.885. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Employment Security provided five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................$3,434,082
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,498,000
From Special Employment Security Fund (1949) (Not to exceed 22.00
F.T.E.) ............................................................................................................$9,932,082
Section 7.890. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Employment Security
For the War on Terror Unemployment Compensation Program
Expense and Equipment
From War on Terror Unemployment Compensation Fund (1736) ...................................$5,000
For payment of benefits
From War on Terror Unemployment Compensation Fund (1736) ...................... 35,000
Total ................................................................................................................................$40,000
Section 7.895. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Employment Security
For the payment of refunds set off against debts as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ...................................................................$10,000,000
Section 7.900. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Missouri Commission on Human Rights, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.905
Personal Service ................................................................................................$725,796
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 15,178
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................740,974
Personal Service ..................................................................................................852,085

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2007 27
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 104,026
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations – Commission on
Human Rights Federal Fund (1117) ...................................................................956,111
For the Martin Luther King, Jr. State Celebration Commission, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 7.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................55,300
From Martin Luther King, Jr. State Celebration Commission Fund
(1438) ....................................................................................................... 5,000
Total (Not to exceed 24.70 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,757,385
Section 7.905. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Department of Economic Development Totals
General Revenue Fund (99.60 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$103,482,259
Federal Funds (56.18 F.T.E.) ...................................................................................200,178,046
Other Funds (44.38 F.T.E.) .................................................................................. 34,648,470
Total (200.16 F.T.E.) .............................................................................................$338,308,775
Department of Commerce and Insurance Totals
General Revenue Fund (2.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$260,001
Federal Funds ...............................................................................................................1,650,000
Other Funds (789.22 F.T.E.) ................................................................................ 86,500,372
Total (791.22 F.T.E.) ...............................................................................................$88,410,373
Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Totals
General Revenue Fund (21.22 F.T.E.) .......................................................................$4,945,228
Federal Funds (584.05 F.T.E.) ...................................................................................62,386,097
Other Funds (182.36 F.T.E.) ................................................................................ 256,553,166
Total (787.63 F.T.E.) .............................................................................................$323,884,491
